Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
166

AGRICULTURAL
PARKS

Section

166-1 Legislative findings

166-2 Definitions

166-3 Authority to plan, develop, and manage
agricultural

parks

166-3.5 Commercial activity

166-4 Park development

166-5 Joint ventures

166-6 Disposition

166-7 Applicants

166-8 Preference right

166-8.5 Rights of holders of security interests

166-9 Rules

166-10 Agricultural park special fund

166-11 Lease negotiation

Cross References

Private agricultural
parks, see chapter 169.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next